Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1051
Student instructor, defined.

Student instructor means a person engaged in instructor's or esthetics instructor's training in a school of cosmetology or school of esthetics and in teaching students in a school of cosmetology or school of esthetics under the supervision of an instructor.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 30;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 16;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-369;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 313.